Mississippi, session 2026, HB4040.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  (1)  As used in this section, the following words shall have the meanings ascribed herein unless the context clearly requires otherwise: (a)  "Accreted value" of any bonds means, as of any date of computation, an amount equal to the sum of (i) the stated initial value of such bond, plus (ii) the interest accrued thereon from the issue date to the date of computation at the rate, compounded semiannually, that is necessary to produce the approximate yield to maturity shown for bonds of the same maturity. (b)  "State" means the State of Mississippi. (c) "Commission" means the State Bond Commission. (2)  (a)  The commission, at one time, or from time to time, may declare by resolution the necessity for issuance of general obligation bonds of the State of Mississippi to provide funds for the Mississippi Agriculture and Timber Economic Development Fund created in Section 2 of this act.  Upon the adoption of a resolution by the Mississippi Development Authority declaring the necessity for the issuance of any part or all of the general obligation bonds authorized by this subsection, the Mississippi Development Authority shall deliver a certified copy of its resolution or resolutions to the commission.  Upon receipt of such resolution, the commission, in its discretion, may act as the issuing agent, prescribe the form of the bonds, determine the appropriate method for sale of the bonds, advertise for and accept bids or negotiate the sale of the bonds, issue and sell the bonds so authorized to be sold, and do any and all other things necessary and advisable in connection with the issuance and sale of such bonds.  The total amount of bonds issued under this section shall not exceed Five Million Dollars ($5,000,000.00).  No bonds authorized under this section shall be issued after July 1, 2030. (b)  The proceeds of bonds issued pursuant to this section shall be deposited into the Mississippi Agriculture and Timber Economic Development Fund created pursuant to Section 2 of this act.  Any investment earnings on bonds issued pursuant to this section shall be used to pay debt service on bonds issued under this section, in accordance with the proceedings authorizing issuance of such bonds. (3)  The principal of and interest on the bonds authorized under this section shall be payable in the manner provided in this subsection.  Such bonds shall bear such date or dates, be in such denomination or denominations, bear interest at such rate or rates (not to exceed the limits set forth in Section 75-17-101, Mississippi Code of 1972), be payable at such place or places within or without the State of Mississippi, shall mature absolutely at such time or times not to exceed twenty-five (25) years from date of issue, be redeemable before maturity at such time or times and upon such terms, with or without premium, shall bear such registration privileges, and shall be substantially in such form, all as shall be determined by resolution of the commission. (4)  The bonds authorized by this section shall be signed by the chairman of the commission, or by his facsimile signature, and the official seal of the commission shall be affixed thereto, attested by the secretary of the commission.  The interest coupons, if any, to be attached to such bonds may be executed by the facsimile signatures of such officers.  Whenever any such bonds shall have been signed by the officials designated to sign the bonds who were in office at the time of such signing but who may have ceased to be such officers before the sale and delivery of such bonds, or who may not have been in office on the date such bonds may bear, the signatures of such officers upon such bonds and coupons shall nevertheless be valid and sufficient for all purposes and have the same effect as if the person so officially signing such bonds had remained in office until their delivery to the purchaser, or had been in office on the date such bonds may bear.  However, notwithstanding anything herein to the contrary, such bonds may be issued as provided in the Registered Bond Act of the State of Mississippi. (5)  All bonds and interest coupons issued under the provisions of this section have all the qualities and incidents of negotiable instruments under the provisions of the Uniform Commercial Code, and in exercising the powers granted by this section, the commission shall not be required to and need not comply with the provisions of the Uniform Commercial Code. (6)  The commission shall act as the issuing agent for the bonds authorized under this section, prescribe the form of the bonds, determine the appropriate method for sale of the bonds, advertise for and accept bids or negotiate the sale of the bonds, issue and sell the bonds so authorized to be sold, pay all fees and costs incurred in such issuance and sale, and do any and all other things necessary and advisable in connection with the issuance and sale of such bonds.  The commission is authorized and empowered to pay the costs that are incident to the sale, issuance and delivery of the bonds authorized under this section from the proceeds derived from the sale of such bonds.  The commission shall sell such bonds on sealed bids at public sale or may negotiate the sale of the bonds for such price as it may determine to be for the best interest of the State of Mississippi.  All interest accruing on such bonds so issued shall be payable semiannually or annually. If the bonds are to be sold on sealed bids at public sale, notice of the sale of any such bonds shall be published at least one time, not less than ten (10) days before the date of sale, and shall be so published in one or more newspapers published or having a general circulation in the City of Jackson, Mississippi,  selected by the commission. The commission, when issuing any bonds under the authority of this section, may provide that bonds, at the option of the State of Mississippi, may be called in for payment and redemption at the call price named therein and accrued interest on such date or dates named therein. (7)  The bonds issued under the provisions of this section are general obligations of the State of Mississippi, and for the payment thereof the full faith and credit of the State of Mississippi is irrevocably pledged.  If the funds appropriated by the Legislature are insufficient to pay the principal of and the interest on such bonds as they become due, then the deficiency shall be paid by the State Treasurer from any funds in the State Treasury not otherwise appropriated.  All such bonds shall contain recitals on their faces substantially covering the provisions of this subsection. (8)  Upon the issuance and sale of bonds under the provisions of this section, the commission shall transfer the proceeds of any such sale or sales to the Mississippi Agriculture and Timber Economic Development Fund created in Section 2 of this act.  The proceeds of such bonds shall be disbursed as provided in such section under such restrictions, if any, as may be contained in the resolution providing for the issuance of the bonds. (9)  The bonds authorized under this section may be issued without any other proceedings or the happening of any other conditions or things other than those proceedings, conditions and things which are specified or required by this section.  Any resolution providing for the issuance of bonds under the provisions of this section shall become effective immediately upon its adoption by the commission, and any such resolution may be adopted at any regular or special meeting of the commission by a majority of its members. (10)  The bonds authorized under the authority of this section may be validated in the Chancery Court of the First Judicial District of Hinds County, Mississippi, in the manner and with the force and effect provided by Chapter 13, Title 31, Mississippi Code of 1972, for the validation of county, municipal, school district and other bonds.  The notice to taxpayers required by such statutes shall be published in a newspaper published or having a general circulation in the City of Jackson, Mississippi. (11)  Any holder of bonds issued under the provisions of this section or of any of the interest coupons pertaining thereto may, either at law or in equity, by suit, action, mandamus or other proceeding, protect and enforce any and all rights granted under this section, or under such resolution, and may enforce and compel performance of all duties required by this section to be performed, in order to provide for the payment of bonds and interest thereon. (12)  All bonds issued under the provisions of this section shall be legal investments for trustees and other fiduciaries, and for savings banks, trust companies and insurance companies organized under the laws of the State of Mississippi, and such bonds shall be legal securities which may be deposited with and shall be received by all public officers and bodies of this state and all municipalities and political subdivisions for the purpose of securing the deposit of public funds. (13)  Bonds issued under the provisions of this section and income therefrom shall be exempt from all taxation in the State of Mississippi. (14)  The proceeds of the bonds issued under this section shall be used solely for the purposes therein provided, including the costs incident to the issuance and sale of such bonds. (15)  The State Treasurer is authorized, without further process of law, to certify to the Department of Finance and Administration the necessity for warrants, and the Department of Finance and Administration is authorized and directed to issue such warrants, in such amounts as may be necessary to pay when due the principal of, premium, if any, and interest on, or the accreted value of, all bonds issued under this section; and the State Treasurer shall forward the necessary amount to the designated place or places of payment of such bonds in ample time to discharge such bonds, or the interest thereon, on the due dates thereof. (16)  This section shall be deemed to be full and complete authority for the exercise of the powers therein granted, but this section shall not be deemed to repeal or to be in derogation of any existing law of this state. SECTION 2.  (1)  (a) The Mississippi Development Authority shall establish a program designed to recruit agriculture and timber related economic development projects to Mississippi for the purpose of providing new markets and additional and increased access to existing markets for the sale of agriculture and timber commodities grown, harvested and/or processed in the State of Mississippi. (2)  There is created in the State Treasury a special fund to be designated as the "Mississippi Agriculture and Timber Economic Development Fund", which shall consist of funds deposited therein under Section 27-65-75(25) and funds from any other source designated for deposit into such fund.  Unexpended amounts remaining in the fund at the end of a fiscal year shall not lapse into the State General Fund, and any investment earnings or interest earned on amounts in the fund shall be deposited to the credit of the fund.  Monies in the fund shall be used by the Mississippi Development Authority, upon appropriation by the Legislature, for the purposes provided in this section. (3)  The Mississippi Development Authority shall have all powers necessary to implement and administer the program established under this section, and the Mississippi Development Authority shall promulgate rules and regulations, in accordance with the Mississippi Administrative Procedures Law, necessary for the implementation of this section. (4)  The Mississippi Development Authority shall file an annual report with the Governor, the Secretary of the Senate and the Clerk of the House of Representatives not later than December 1 of each year, describing the economic impact of the program established under subsection (1) of this section.  The report must include a detailed description of all assistance provided and expenditures made under the program, along with any other information determined by the Mississippi Development Authority to be relevant to the program. SECTION 3.  Section 27-65-75, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 27-65-75.  On or before the fifteenth day of each month, the revenue collected under the provisions of this chapter during the preceding month shall be paid and distributed as follows: (1)  (a)  On or before August 15, 1992, and each succeeding month thereafter through July 15, 1993, eighteen percent (18%) of the total sales tax revenue collected during the preceding month under the provisions of this chapter, except that collected under the provisions of Sections 27-65-15, 27-65-19(3) and 27-65-21, on business activities within a municipal corporation shall be allocated for distribution to the municipality and paid to the municipal corporation.  Except as otherwise provided in this paragraph (a), on or before August 15, 1993, and each succeeding month thereafter through August 15, 2025, eighteen and one-half percent (18-1/2%) of the total sales tax revenue collected during the preceding month under the provisions of this chapter, except that collected under the provisions of Sections 27-65-15, 27-65-19(3), 27-65-21 and 27-65-24, on business activities within a municipal corporation shall be allocated for distribution to the municipality and paid to the municipal corporation.  Except as otherwise provided in this paragraph (a), on or before September 15, 2025, and each succeeding month thereafter, eighteen and one-half percent (18.5%) of the total sales tax revenue collected during the preceding month under this chapter, except that collected under Sections 27-65-15, 27-65-17(1)(n), 27-65-19(3), 27-65-21 and 27-65-24, on business activities within a municipal corporation shall be allocated for distribution and paid to the municipal corporation.  On or before September 15, 2025, and each succeeding month thereafter, twenty-five and nine-tenths percent (25.9%) of the total sales tax revenue collected during the preceding month under Section 27-65-17(1)(n) on business activities within a municipal corporation shall be allocated for distribution and paid to the municipal corporation.  However, in the event the State Auditor issues a certificate of noncompliance pursuant to Section 21-35-31, the department shall withhold ten percent (10%) of the allocations and payments to the municipality that would otherwise be payable to the municipality under this paragraph (a) until such time that the department receives written notice of the cancellation of a certificate of noncompliance from the State Auditor. A municipal corporation, for the purpose of distributing the tax under this subsection, shall mean and include all incorporated cities, towns and villages. Monies allocated for distribution and credited to a municipal corporation under this paragraph may be pledged as security for a loan if the distribution received by the municipal corporation is otherwise authorized or required by law to be pledged as security for such a loan. In any county having a county seat that is not an incorporated municipality, the distribution provided under this subsection shall be made as though the county seat was an incorporated municipality; however, the distribution to the municipality shall be paid to the county treasury in which the municipality is located, and those funds shall be used for road, bridge and street construction or maintenance in the county. (b)  On or before August 15, 2006, and each succeeding month thereafter through August 15, 2025, eighteen and one-half percent (18-1/2%) of the total sales tax revenue collected during the preceding month under the provisions of this chapter, except that collected under the provisions of Sections 27-65-15, 27-65-19(3) and 27-65-21, on business activities on the campus of a state institution of higher learning or community or junior college whose campus is not located within the corporate limits of a municipality, shall be allocated for distribution to the state institution of higher learning or community or junior college and paid to the state institution of higher learning or community or junior college.  On or before September 15, 2025, and each succeeding month thereafter, eighteen and one-half percent (18.5%) of the total sales tax revenue collected during the preceding month under this chapter, except that collected under Sections 27-65-15, 27-65-17(1)(n), 27-65-19(3) and 27-65-21, on business activities on the campus of a state institution of higher learning or community or junior college whose campus is not located within the corporate limits of a municipality, shall be allocated for distribution and paid to the state institution of higher learning or community or junior college.  On or before September 15, 2025, and each succeeding month thereafter, twenty-five and nine-tenths percent (25.9%) of the total sales tax revenue collected during the preceding month under Section 27-65-17(1)(n) on business activities on the campus of a state institution of higher learning or community or junior college whose campus is not located within the corporate limits of a municipality, shall be allocated for distribution and paid to the state institution of higher learning or community or junior college. (c)  On or before August 15, 2018, and each succeeding month thereafter until August 14, 2019, two percent (2%) of the total sales tax revenue collected during the preceding month under the provisions of this chapter, except that collected under the provisions of Sections 27-65-15, 27-65-19(3), 27-65-21 and 27-65-24, on business activities within the corporate limits of the City of Jackson, Mississippi, shall be deposited into the Capitol Complex Improvement District Project Fund created in Section 29-5-215.  On or before August 15, 2019, and each succeeding month thereafter until August 14, 2020, four percent (4%) of the total sales tax revenue collected during the preceding month under the provisions of this chapter, except that collected under the provisions of Sections 27-65-15, 27-65-19(3), 27-65-21 and 27-65-24, on business activities within the corporate limits of the City of Jackson, Mississippi, shall be deposited into the Capitol Complex Improvement District Project Fund created in Section 29-5-215.  On or before August 15, 2020, and each succeeding month thereafter through July 15, 2023, six percent (6%) of the total sales tax revenue collected during the preceding month under the provisions of this chapter, except that collected under the provisions of Sections 27-65-15, 27-65-19(3), 27-65-21 and 27-65-24, on business activities within the corporate limits of the City of Jackson, Mississippi, shall be deposited into the Capitol Complex Improvement District Project Fund created in Section 29-5-215.  On or before August 15, 2023, and each succeeding month thereafter through August 15, 2025, nine percent (9%) of the total sales tax revenue collected during the preceding month under the provisions of this chapter, except that collected under the provisions of Sections 27-65-15, 27-65-19(3), 27-65-21 and 27-65-24, on business activities within the corporate limits of the City of Jackson, Mississippi, shall be deposited into the Capitol Complex Improvement District Project Fund created in Section 29-5-215.  On or before September 15, 2025, and each succeeding month thereafter, nine percent (9%) of the total sales tax revenue collected during the preceding month under this chapter, except that collected under Sections 27-65-15, 27-65-17(1)(n), 27-65-19(3), 27-65-21 and 27-65-24, on business activities within the corporate limits of the City of Jackson, Mississippi, shall be deposited into the Capitol Complex Improvement District Project Fund created in Section 27-5-215.  On or before September 15, 2025, and each succeeding month thereafter, twelve and six-tenths percent (12.6%) of the total sales tax revenue collected during the preceding month under Section 27-65-17(1)(n) on business activities within the corporate limits of the City of Jackson, Mississippi, shall be deposited into the Capitol Complex Improvement District Project Fund created in Section 27-5-215. (d)  (i)  Except as otherwise provided in this paragraph (d), on or before the fifteenth day of the month that the diversion authorized by this section begins, and each succeeding month thereafter, eighteen and one-half percent (18-1/2%) of the total sales tax revenue collected during the preceding month under the provisions of this chapter, except that collected under the provisions of Sections 27-65-15, 27-65-19(3) and 27-65-21, on business activities within a redevelopment project area developed under a redevelopment plan adopted under the Tax Increment Financing Act (Section 21-45-1 et seq.) shall be allocated for distribution to the county in which the project area is located if: 1.  The county: a. Borders on the Mississippi Sound and the State of Alabama, or b.  Is Harrison County, Mississippi, and the project area is within a radius of two (2) miles from the intersection of Interstate 10 and Menge Avenue; 2.  The county has issued bonds under Section 21-45-9 to finance all or a portion of a redevelopment project in the redevelopment project area; 3.  Any debt service for the indebtedness incurred is outstanding; and 4.  A development with a value of Ten Million Dollars ($10,000,000.00) or more is, or will be, located in the redevelopment area. (ii)  For a county that is eligible to receive funds under this paragraph (d), as determined by the department under this paragraph (d), from and after September 15, 2025, and each succeeding month thereafter, eighteen and one-half percent (18.5%) of the total sales tax revenue collected during the preceding month under this chapter, except that collected under Sections 27-65-15, 27-65-17(1)(n), 27-65-19(3) and 27-65-21, on business activities within a redevelopment project area developed under a redevelopment plan adopted under the Tax Increment Financing Act (Section 21-45-1 et seq.) shall be allocated for distribution to the county in which the project is located, and twenty-five and nine-tenths percent (25.9%) of the total sales tax revenue collected during the preceding month under Section 27-65-17(1)(n) shall be allocated for distribution to that county. (iii)  Before any sales tax revenue may be allocated for distribution to a county under this paragraph (d), the county shall certify to the Department of Revenue that the requirements of this paragraph (d) have been met, the amount of bonded indebtedness that has been incurred by the county for the redevelopment project and the expected date the indebtedness incurred by the county will be satisfied. (iv)  The diversion of sales tax revenue authorized by this paragraph (d) shall begin the month following the month in which the Department of Revenue determines that the requirements of this paragraph (d) have been met.  The diversion shall end the month the indebtedness incurred by the county is satisfied.  All revenue received by the county under this paragraph (d) shall be deposited in the fund required to be created in the tax increment financing plan under Section 21-45-11 and be utilized solely to satisfy the indebtedness incurred by the county. (2)  On or before September 15, 1987, and each succeeding month thereafter, from the revenue collected under this chapter during the preceding month, One Million One Hundred Twenty-five Thousand Dollars ($1,125,000.00) shall be allocated for distribution to municipal corporations as defined under subsection (1) of this section in the proportion that the number of gallons of gasoline and diesel fuel sold by distributors to consumers and retailers in each such municipality during the preceding fiscal year bears to the total gallons of gasoline and diesel fuel sold by distributors to consumers and retailers in municipalities statewide during the preceding fiscal year.  The Department of Revenue shall require all distributors of gasoline and diesel fuel to report to the department monthly the total number of gallons of gasoline and diesel fuel sold by them to consumers and retailers in each municipality during the preceding month.  The Department of Revenue shall have the authority to promulgate such rules and regulations as is necessary to determine the number of gallons of gasoline and diesel fuel sold by distributors to consumers and retailers in each municipality.  In determining the percentage allocation of funds under this subsection for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 1987, and ending June 30, 1988, the Department of Revenue may consider gallons of gasoline and diesel fuel sold for a period of less than one (1) fiscal year. For the purposes of this subsection, the term "fiscal year" means the fiscal year beginning July 1 of a year. (3)  On or before September 15, 1987, and on or before the fifteenth day of each succeeding month, until the date specified in Section 65-39-35, the proceeds derived from contractors' taxes levied under Section 27-65-21 on contracts for the construction or reconstruction of highways designated under the highway program created under Section 65-3-97 shall, except as otherwise provided in Section 31-17-127, be deposited into the State Treasury to the credit of the State Highway Fund to be used to fund that highway program.  The Mississippi Department of Transportation shall provide to the Department of Revenue such information as is necessary to determine the amount of proceeds to be distributed under this subsection. (4)  On or before August 15, 1994, and on or before the fifteenth day of each succeeding month through July 15, 1999, from the proceeds of gasoline, diesel fuel or kerosene taxes as provided in Section 27-5-101(a)(ii)1, Four Million Dollars ($4,000,000.00) shall be deposited in the State Treasury to the credit of a special fund designated as the "State Aid Road Fund," created by Section 65-9-17. On or before August 15, 1999, and on or before the fifteenth day of each succeeding month through August 15, 2026, from the total amount of the proceeds of gasoline, diesel fuel or kerosene taxes apportioned by Section 27-5-101(a)(ii)1, Four Million Dollars ($4,000,000.00) or an amount equal to twenty-three and one-fourth percent (23-1/4%) of those funds, whichever is the greater amount, shall be deposited in the State Treasury to the credit of the "State Aid Road Fund," created by Section 65-9-17.  After August 15, 2025, from the total amount of the proceeds of gasoline, diesel fuel or kerosene taxes apportioned by Section 27-5-101(a)(ii)1 and (iii), Five Million Dollars ($5,000,000.00) or an amount equal to twenty-three and one-fourth percent (23-1/4%) of those funds, whichever is greater, shall be deposited in the State Treasury to the credit of the "State Aid Road Fund" on or before September 15, 2025, and on or before the fifteenth day of each succeeding month through August 15, 2026, and Six Million Five Hundred Thousand Dollars ($6,500,000.00) or an amount equal to twenty-three and one-fourth percent (23-1/4%) of those funds, whichever is greater, shall be deposited in the State Treasury to the credit of the "State Aid Road Fund" on or before September 15, 2026, and on or before the fifteenth day of each succeeding month through August 15, 2027, and Eight Million Dollars ($8,000,000.00) or an amount equal to twenty-three and one-fourth percent (23-1/4%) of those funds, whichever is greater, shall be deposited in the State Treasury to the credit of the "State Aid Road Fund" on or before September 15, 2027, and on or before the fifteenth day of each succeeding month.  From the amount of taxes paid into the special fund under this subsection and subsection (9) of this section, there shall be first deducted and paid the amount necessary to pay the expenses of the Office of State Aid Road Construction, as authorized by the Legislature for all other general and special fund agencies.  The remainder of the funds shall be allocated monthly to the several counties in accordance with the following formula: (a)  One-third (1/3) shall be allocated to all counties in equal shares; (b)  One-third (1/3) shall be allocated to counties based on the proportion that the total number of rural road miles in a county bears to the total number of rural road miles in all counties of the state; and (c)  One-third (1/3) shall be allocated to counties based on the proportion that the rural population of the county bears to the total rural population in all counties of the state, according to the latest federal decennial census. For the purposes of this subsection, the term "gasoline, diesel fuel or kerosene taxes" means such taxes as defined in paragraph (f) of Section 27-5-101. The amount of funds allocated to any county under this subsection for any fiscal year after fiscal year 1994 shall not be less than the amount allocated to the county for fiscal year 1994. Any reference in the general laws of this state or the Mississippi Code of 1972 to Section 27-5-105 shall mean and be construed to refer and apply to subsection (4) of Section 27-65-75. (5)  On or before August 15, 2024, and each succeeding month thereafter, One Million Six Hundred Sixty-six Thousand Six Hundred Sixty-six Dollars ($1,666,666.00) shall be paid into the special fund known as the Education Enhancement Fund created and existing under the provisions of Section 37-61-33. (6)  An amount each month beginning August 15, 1983, through November 15, 1986, as specified in Section 6, Chapter 542, Laws of 1983, shall be paid into the special fund known as the Correctional Facilities Construction Fund created in Section 6, Chapter 542, Laws of 1983. (7)  On or before August 15, 1992, and each succeeding month thereafter through July 15, 2000, two and two hundred sixty-six one-thousandths percent (2.266%) of the total sales tax revenue collected during the preceding month under the provisions of this chapter, except that collected under the provisions of Section 27-65-17(2), shall be deposited by the department into the School Ad Valorem Tax Reduction Fund created under Section 37-61-35.  On or before August 15, 2000, and each succeeding month thereafter through August 15, 2025, two and two hundred sixty-six one-thousandths percent (2.266%) of the total sales tax revenue collected during the preceding month under the provisions of this chapter, except that collected under the provisions of Section 27-65-17(2), shall be deposited into the School Ad Valorem Tax Reduction Fund created under Section 37-61-35 until such time that the total amount deposited into the fund during a fiscal year equals Forty-two Million Dollars ($42,000,000.00).  Thereafter, the amounts diverted under this subsection (7) during the fiscal year in excess of Forty-two Million Dollars ($42,000,000.00) shall be deposited into the Education Enhancement Fund created under Section 37-61-33 for appropriation by the Legislature as other education needs and shall not be subject to the percentage appropriation requirements set forth in Section 37-61-33.  On or before September 15, 2025, and each succeeding month thereafter, two and two hundred sixty-six one-thousandths percent (2.266%) of the total sales tax revenue collected during the preceding month under this chapter, except that collected under Section 27-65-17(1)(n) and (2), and three and seventeen one-hundredths percent (3.17%) of the total sales tax revenue collected during the preceding month under Section 27-65-17(1)(n), shall be deposited into the School Ad Valorem Tax Reduction Fund created under Section 37-61-35 until such time that the total amount deposited into the fund during a fiscal year equals Forty-two Million Dollars ($42,000,000.00). Thereafter, the amounts diverted under this subsection (7) during the fiscal year in excess of Forty-two Million Dollars ($42,000,000.00) shall be deposited into the Education Enhancement Fund created under Section 37-61-33 for appropriation by the Legislature as other education needs and shall not be subject to the percentage appropriation requirements set forth in Section 37-61-33. (8)  On or before August 15, 1992, and each succeeding month thereafter through August 15, 2025, nine and seventy-three one-thousandths percent (9.073%) of the total sales tax revenue collected during the preceding month under the provisions of this chapter, except that collected under the provisions of Section 27-65-17(2), shall be deposited into the Education Enhancement Fund created under Section 37-61-33.  On or before September 15, 2025, and each succeeding month thereafter, nine and seventy-three one-thousandths percent (9.073%) of the total sales tax revenue collected during the preceding month under this chapter, except that collected under Section 27-65-17(1)(n) and (2), and twelve and seven-tenths percent (12.7%) of the total sales tax revenue collected during the preceding month under Section 27-65-17(1)(n), shall be deposited into the Education Enhancement Fund created under Section 37-61-33. (9)  On or before August 15, 1994, and each succeeding month thereafter, from the revenue collected under this chapter during the preceding month, Two Hundred Fifty Thousand Dollars ($250,000.00) shall be paid into the State Aid Road Fund. (10)  On or before August 15, 1994, and each succeeding month thereafter through August 15, 1995, from the revenue collected under this chapter during the preceding month, Two Million Dollars ($2,000,000.00) shall be deposited into the Motor Vehicle Ad Valorem Tax Reduction Fund established in Section 27-51-105. (11)  Notwithstanding any other provision of this section to the contrary, on or before February 15, 1995, and each succeeding month thereafter, the sales tax revenue collected during the preceding month under the provisions of Section 27-65-17(2) and the corresponding levy in Section 27-65-23 on the rental or lease of private carriers of passengers and light carriers of property as defined in Section 27-51-101 shall be deposited, without diversion, into the Motor Vehicle Ad Valorem Tax Reduction Fund established in Section 27-51-105. (12)  Notwithstanding any other provision of this section to the contrary, on or before August 15, 1995, and each succeeding month thereafter, the sales tax revenue collected during the preceding month under the provisions of Section 27-65-17(1) on retail sales of private carriers of passengers and light carriers of property, as defined in Section 27-51-101 and the corresponding levy in Section 27-65-23 on the rental or lease of these vehicles, shall be deposited, after diversion, into the Motor Vehicle Ad Valorem Tax Reduction Fund established in Section 27-51-105. (13)  On or before July 15, 1994, and on or before the fifteenth day of each succeeding month thereafter, that portion of the avails of the tax imposed in Section 27-65-22 that is derived from activities held on the Mississippi State Fairgrounds Complex shall be paid into a special fund that is created in the State Treasury and shall be expended upon legislative appropriation solely to defray the costs of repairs and renovation at the Trade Mart and Coliseum. (14)  On or before August 15, 1998, and each succeeding month thereafter through July 15, 2005, that portion of the avails of the tax imposed in Section 27-65-23 that is derived from sales by cotton compresses or cotton warehouses and that would otherwise be paid into the General Fund shall be deposited in an amount not to exceed Two Million Dollars ($2,000,000.00) into the special fund created under Section 69-37-39. On or before August 15, 2007, and each succeeding month thereafter through July 15, 2010, that portion of the avails of the tax imposed in Section 27-65-23 that is derived from sales by cotton compresses or cotton warehouses and that would otherwise be paid into the General Fund shall be deposited in an amount not to exceed Two Million Dollars ($2,000,000.00) into the special fund created under Section 69-37-39 until all debts or other obligations incurred by the Certified Cotton Growers Organization under the Mississippi Boll Weevil Management Act before January 1, 2007, are satisfied in full.  On or before August 15, 2010, and each succeeding month thereafter through July 15, 2011, fifty percent (50%) of that portion of the avails of the tax imposed in Section 27-65-23 that is derived from sales by cotton compresses or cotton warehouses and that would otherwise be paid into the General Fund shall be deposited into the special fund created under Section 69-37-39 until such time that the total amount deposited into the fund during a fiscal year equals One Million Dollars ($1,000,000.00).  On or before August 15, 2011, and each succeeding month thereafter, that portion of the avails of the tax imposed in Section 27-65-23 that is derived from sales by cotton compresses or cotton warehouses and that would otherwise be paid into the General Fund shall be deposited into the special fund created under Section 69-37-39 until such time that the total amount deposited into the fund during a fiscal year equals One Million Dollars ($1,000,000.00). (15)  Notwithstanding any other provision of this section to the contrary, on or before September 15, 2000, and each succeeding month thereafter, the sales tax revenue collected during the preceding month under the provisions of Section 27-65-19(1)(d)(i)2, and 27-65-19(1)(d)(i)3 shall be deposited, without diversion, into the Telecommunications Ad Valorem Tax Reduction Fund established in Section 27-38-7. (16)  (a)  On or before August 15, 2000, and each succeeding month thereafter, the sales tax revenue collected during the preceding month under the provisions of this chapter on the gross proceeds of sales of a project as defined in Section 57-30-1 shall be deposited, after all diversions except the diversion provided for in subsection (1) of this section, into the Sales Tax Incentive Fund created in Section 57-30-3. (b)  On or before August 15, 2007, and each succeeding month thereafter, eighty percent (80%) of the sales tax revenue collected during the preceding month under the provisions of this chapter from the operation of a tourism project under the provisions of Sections 57-26-1 through 57-26-5, shall be deposited, after the diversions required in subsections (7) and (8) of this section, into the Tourism Project Sales Tax Incentive Fund created in Section 57-26-3. (17)  Notwithstanding any other provision of this section to the contrary, on or before April 15, 2002, and each succeeding month thereafter, the sales tax revenue collected during the preceding month under Section 27-65-23 on sales of parking services of parking garages and lots at airports shall be deposited, without diversion, into the special fund created under Section 27-5-101(d). (18)  [Repealed] (19)  (a)  On or before August 15, 2005, and each succeeding month thereafter, the sales tax revenue collected during the preceding month under the provisions of this chapter on the gross proceeds of sales of a business enterprise located within a redevelopment project area under the provisions of Sections 57-91-1 through 57-91-11, and the revenue collected on the gross proceeds of sales from sales made to a business enterprise located in a redevelopment project area under the provisions of Sections 57-91-1 through 57-91-11 (provided that such sales made to a business enterprise are made on the premises of the business enterprise), shall, except as otherwise provided in this subsection (19), be deposited, after all diversions, into the Redevelopment Project Incentive Fund as created in Section 57-91-9. (b)  For a municipality participating in the Economic Redevelopment Act created in Sections 57-91-1 through 57-91-11, the diversion provided for in subsection (1) of this section attributable to the gross proceeds of sales of a business enterprise located within a redevelopment project area under the provisions of Sections 57-91-1 through 57-91-11, and attributable to the gross proceeds of sales from sales made to a business enterprise located in a redevelopment project area under the provisions of Sections 57-91-1 through 57-91-11 (provided that such sales made to a business enterprise are made on the premises of the business enterprise), shall be deposited into the Redevelopment Project Incentive Fund as created in Section 57-91-9, as follows: (i)  For the first six (6) years in which payments are made to a developer from the Redevelopment Project Incentive Fund, one hundred percent (100%) of the diversion shall be deposited into the fund; (ii)  For the seventh year in which such payments are made to a developer from the Redevelopment Project Incentive Fund, eighty percent (80%) of the diversion shall be deposited into the fund; (iii)  For the eighth year in which such payments are made to a developer from the Redevelopment Project Incentive Fund, seventy percent (70%) of the diversion shall be deposited into the fund; (iv)  For the ninth year in which such payments are made to a developer from the Redevelopment Project Incentive Fund, sixty percent (60%) of the diversion shall be deposited into the fund; and (v)  For the tenth year in which such payments are made to a developer from the Redevelopment Project Incentive Fund, fifty percent (50%) of the funds shall be deposited into the fund. (20)  On or before January 15, 2007, and each succeeding month thereafter, eighty percent (80%) of the sales tax revenue collected during the preceding month under the provisions of this chapter from the operation of a tourism project under the provisions of Sections 57-28-1 through 57-28-5 shall be deposited, after the diversions required in subsections (7) and (8) of this section, into the Tourism Sales Tax Incentive Fund created in Section 57-28-3. (21)  (a)  On or before April 15, 2007, and each succeeding month thereafter through June 15, 2013, One Hundred Fifty Thousand Dollars ($150,000.00) of the sales tax revenue collected during the preceding month under the provisions of this chapter shall be deposited into the MMEIA Tax Incentive Fund created in Section 57-101-3. (b)  On or before July 15, 2013, and each succeeding month thereafter, One Hundred Fifty Thousand Dollars ($150,000.00) of the sales tax revenue collected during the preceding month under the provisions of this chapter shall be deposited into the Mississippi Development Authority Job Training Grant Fund created in Section 57-1-451. (22)  On or before June 1, 2024, and each succeeding month thereafter until December 31, 2057, an amount determined annually by the Mississippi Development Authority of the sales tax revenue collected during the preceding month under the provisions of this chapter shall be deposited into the MMEIA Tax Incentive Fund created in Section 57-125-3.  This amount shall be based on estimated payments due within the upcoming year to construction contractors pursuant to construction contracts subject to the tax imposed by Section 27-65-21 for construction to be performed on the project site of a project defined under Section 57-75-5(f)(xxxiii) for the coming year. (23)  Notwithstanding any other provision of this section to the contrary, on or before August 15, 2009, and each succeeding month thereafter, the sales tax revenue collected during the preceding month under the provisions of Section 27-65-201 shall be deposited, without diversion, into the Motor Vehicle Ad Valorem Tax Reduction Fund established in Section 27-51-105. (24)  (a)  On or before August 15, 2019, and each month thereafter through July 15, 2020, one percent (1%) of the total sales tax revenue collected during the preceding month from restaurants and hotels shall be allocated for distribution to the Mississippi Development Authority Tourism Advertising Fund established under Section 57-1-64, to be used exclusively for the purpose stated therein.  On or before August 15, 2020, and each month thereafter through July 15, 2021, two percent (2%) of the total sales tax revenue collected during the preceding month from restaurants and hotels shall be allocated for distribution to the Mississippi Development Authority Tourism Advertising Fund established under Section 57-1-64, to be used exclusively for the purpose stated therein.  On or before August 15, 2021, and each month thereafter, three percent (3%) of the total sales tax revenue collected during the preceding month from restaurants and hotels shall be allocated for distribution to the Mississippi Development Authority Tourism Advertising Fund established under Section 57-1-64, to be used exclusively for the purpose stated therein.  The revenue diverted pursuant to this subsection shall not be available for expenditure until February 1, 2020. (b)  The Joint Legislative Committee on Performance Evaluation and Expenditure Review (PEER) must provide an annual report to the Legislature indicating the amount of funds deposited into the Mississippi Development Authority Tourism Advertising Fund established under Section 57-1-64, and a detailed record of how the funds are spent. (25)  On or before September 15, 2026, and each succeeding month thereafter, fifty percent (50%) of the total sales tax revenue collected during the preceding month under Section 27-65-17(1)(b) and (c)(i) on retail sales of farm tractors and parts and labor used to maintain and/or repair such tractors, and retail sales of farm implements shall be deposited, after diversion, into the Mississippi Agriculture and Timber Economic Development Fund created in Section 2 of this act. ( * * *2526)  The remainder of the amounts collected under the provisions of this chapter shall be paid into the State Treasury to the credit of the General Fund. ( * * *2627)  (a)  It shall be the duty of the municipal officials of any municipality that expands its limits, or of any community that incorporates as a municipality, to notify the commissioner of that action thirty (30) days before the effective date.  Failure to so notify the commissioner shall cause the municipality to forfeit the revenue that it would have been entitled to receive during this period of time when the commissioner had no knowledge of the action. (b)  (i)  Except as otherwise provided in subparagraph (ii) of this paragraph, if any funds have been erroneously disbursed to any municipality or any overpayment of tax is recovered by the taxpayer, the commissioner may make correction and adjust the error or overpayment with the municipality by withholding the necessary funds from any later payment to be made to the municipality. (ii)  Subject to the provisions of Sections 27-65-51 and 27-65-53, if any funds have been erroneously disbursed to a municipality under subsection (1) of this section for a period of three (3) years or more, the maximum amount that may be recovered or withheld from the municipality is the total amount of funds erroneously disbursed for a period of three (3) years beginning with the date of the first erroneous disbursement.  However, if during such period, a municipality provides written notice to the Department of Revenue indicating the erroneous disbursement of funds, then the maximum amount that may be recovered or withheld from the municipality is the total amount of funds erroneously disbursed for a period of one (1) year beginning with the date of the first erroneous disbursement. SECTION 4.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.